Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Chapter 5

Sale on Execution

26-5-101. Publication and posting of notice.

The officer making a levy on land shall publish such sale at least three (3) different times in a newspaper published in the county where the sale is to be made.

The first publication shall be at least twenty (20) days prior to the sale, unless the amount of the indebtedness for the payment of which the property is being sold does not amount to more than two hundred dollars ($200), in which event the owner of the property may order that advertisement be made by written notices posted as provided in § 35-5-103, instead of by notices published in a newspaper.

If no newspaper is published in the county in which the land is to be sold, the advertisement in a newspaper, unless ordered by court, is dispensed with and such land shall be sold in accordance with § 35-5-103.

If the sale be of personalty, the officer shall advertise the time and place of the sale in at least five (5) public places in the officer's county, one (1) of which shall be the door of the courthouse, and another, at the most public place in the neighborhood of the defendant.

Constables residing out of the district including the county seat, shall not be required to advertise the sale of personalty at the courthouse door.

Code 1858, § 3039 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 103, § 2; 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 3); Shan., § 4767; Code 1932, § 8897; Acts 1943, ch. 123, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8897; Acts 1957, ch. 41, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-701.

Cross-References. Authority of judge to secure auctioneer, § 35-5-112.

Sale on distress warrant for privilege taxes, § 67-4-110.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 722.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 32, 36, 43.

Law Reviews.

Forms of Relief, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 400.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

26-5-102. Length of posting.

The advertisement of sale by posted written notice shall be at least twenty (20) days for land, and ten (10) days for all other kinds of property, except for the sale of fruits and vegetables, or other perishable articles, when the sale may be made after advertisement by the officer making the levy, on twenty-four (24) hours' written notice thereof being posted in three (3) conspicuous places in the civil district of the place of levy and sale.

Code 1858, § 3041; Acts 1893, ch. 16, § 1; Shan., § 4769; mod. Code 1932, § 8899; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-702.

Cross-References. Number and location of posting places, § 26-5-101.

26-5-103. Notice to defendant occupying land.

If the defendant is in actual possession and occupation of the land levied on, the officer having the execution shall, at least twenty (20) days prior to such sale, serve the defendant with written notice, stating that the execution is levied on the land, and mentioning the time and place of sale; and sales made without the notice required in this section are voidable.

Code 1858, § 3042 (deriv. Acts 1799, ch. 14, § 1; 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 2); Shan., § 4770; mod. Code 1932, § 8900; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-703.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 36; 43; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 12.

26-5-104. Hour of sale.

Execution sales shall be made between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.).

Code 1858, § 3038 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 99, § 1); Shan., § 4766; Code 1932, § 8896; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-704; Acts 2017, ch. 187, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.)” for “between the hours of ten o'clock in the forenoon (10:00 a.m.) and four o'clock in the afternoon (4:00 p.m.)”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 187, § 3. April 19, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 37.

26-5-105. Plan of division of land.

At any time before ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.), on the day of sale, the defendant may deliver to the officer a plan of division of the lands levied on, subscribed by the defendant, and it shall, in that case, be the duty of the officer to sell, according to the plan, so much of the land as may be necessary to satisfy the debt and costs, and no more. If no such plan is furnished, the officer may sell without any division.

Code 1858, § 3043 (deriv. Acts 1799, ch. 14, § 3); Shan., § 4771; Code 1932, § 8901; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-705.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 38.

26-5-106. Transfer of corporate stock.

Upon the sale of corporate stock or shares by execution, the officer, on receiving from the purchaser the amount of the purchaser's bid, shall execute and deliver to the purchaser an assignment of the certificate of shares sold.

The officer's return of the sale on the back of the execution shall be notice to all the world of the fact of sale.

On presentation to the proper officer of the company of such assignment, the officer shall transfer the shares on the proper book, to the purchaser or assignee.

Code 1858, § 3053 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858 Private, ch. 163, § 16); Shan., § 4780; mod. Code 1932, § 8910; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-706.

26-5-107. Sale of intoxicating liquors.

In any suit at law or in equity, whether now pending or hereafter instituted, wherein an attachment is issued and levied upon intoxicating liquors, and/or wherein an execution is awarded and levied upon intoxicating liquors, such liquors may be sold by the levying officer by advertising such liquor for sale in the same way and manner now provided by law for the sale of any other property attached or levied upon by an execution.

The purchaser of such intoxicating liquors at such attachment and/or execution sale shall be authorized to transport such liquors from the place of sale to any place beyond the boundaries of this state, or to any county within the state, only in event the sale of intoxicating liquors is authorized and legalized in such other county.

Before such purchaser shall transport from the place of sale the liquors so purchased, the purchaser shall procure a permit from the officer making the sale, which permit shall state the name or style of the case or suit, the name of the court in which the same is pending, the quantity of liquors so sold, and the price paid by the purchaser, and the permit shall constitute a bill of sale to the purchaser, and shall be carried in person by the purchaser, the purchaser's agent or employee, as such person transports such intoxicating liquors to its destination.

This section shall not authorize the sale of intoxicating liquors, as now defined by the laws in force in this state, in any other way or manner, nor for any other purpose, except as hereinabove provided; provided, however, the judgment creditor, if he be the purchaser, may sell such liquors to any licensed dealer.

Acts 1937, ch. 306, §§ 1-4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 8964.1-8964.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-707 — 26-710.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 17.

26-5-108. Unpaid taxes.

Whenever real estate is sold under a decree of any court, it shall be the duty of the judge of the court, before the sale is confirmed to the purchaser, while the funds are in court, to have a reference, to the clerk or clerk and master, while the funds are in court, to ascertain if, upon the day of sale, there were any taxes due and unpaid which were a lien upon the real estate; and, if it is found that there were such taxes, a decree shall be entered in the cause stating the amount of taxes, and directing the clerk and master or clerk to pay the taxes out of the first money collected from the sale of the real estate.

In ascertaining the taxes due under a reference as required by subsection (a), the clerk or clerk and master shall issue to each of the officials charged with the collection of any taxes that might or could be a lien on the property, a statement giving the style and number of the cause, a description of the property sold, and the name of the party or parties out of whom the title is or is to be divested; whereupon, each of the officials shall certify to the clerk or clerk and master an itemized statement of the taxes, interest, penalties, and costs that are at that date a lien upon the land in the official's hands for collection, from which statement the clerk or clerk and master shall report to the court the amount of taxes, interest, penalties, and costs that is a lien on the land.

Acts 1871, ch. 68, § 1; Acts 1897, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 969-969a2; Code 1932, §§ 1678-1680; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-711 — 26-713; Acts 2005, ch. 429, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 49; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 46; 21 Tenn. Juris., Reference and Commissioners, §§ 3, 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Court clerk's application of delinquent tax sale proceeds to pay taxes for subsequent years. OAG 12-85, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (9/10/12).

26-5-109. Certificate to purchaser of land.

On the sale of land by execution, the officer shall give to the purchaser a certificate, if demanded, of the fact, stating the date of sale, the amount of the bid, the execution under which the land is sold, and the description of the land as given in the levy.

Code 1858, § 3054; Shan., § 4781; Code 1932, § 8911; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-714.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 41.

26-5-110. Delivery of certificate on redemption.

If the land is redeemed, the purchaser or purchaser's assignee shall assign and deliver the sheriff's certificate to the person redeeming.

Code 1858, § 3055; Shan., § 4782; Code 1932, § 8912; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-715.

Cross-References. Redemption from sale, title 66, ch. 8.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 41, 48.

26-5-111. Purchaser's right to deed.

The purchaser, after payment of the money bid at execution, or the person succeeding to the purchaser's rights, may, at any time, either within or after the expiration of the two (2) years allowed for redemption, demand from the officer or the officer's successor a deed, who shall execute it accordingly.

Code 1858, § 3056; Shan., § 4783; Code 1932, § 8913; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-716.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 41, 48.

26-5-112. Deed of successor in office.

Any sheriff, coroner, or trustee may execute a deed for lands sold by a former sheriff, coroner, or trustee, which deed shall be valid, as if executed by such former officer; and such deed shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all the statements and recitals contained therein.

All such deeds, heretofore executed by any successor of such sheriff, coroner, or trustee, shall be as valid as if executed by such former officer, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all the statements and recitals contained in such deeds.

Code 1858, § 3058 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 84); Acts 1901, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4785, 4785a1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8915, 8916; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-717, 26-718.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 41, 42.

26-5-113. Deed on redemption.

If the officer's deed is made within two (2) years, the person obtaining it, in case the land is redeemed from such person, shall make to the redeeming party, a complete deed, proved or acknowledged for registration, divesting the person acquiring by the officer's deed and vesting the other with the title acquired. In like manner, title shall be made upon each subsequent redemption, but at the cost of the party redeeming.

Code 1858, § 3057 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 2); Shan., § 4784; Code 1932, § 8914; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-719.

Cross-References. Redemption from sale, title 66, ch. 8.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 48.

26-5-114. Satisfaction set aside for want of title.

Where execution from a court of record or a general sessions court is returned satisfied, in whole or part, by the sale of property of the defendant, and the plaintiff in the judgment shall establish that no title to the property so sold was obtained, the plaintiff may have the satisfaction of the judgment set aside, and the judgment or decree revived by scire facias.

The scire facias may be obtained on affidavit of the plaintiff, the plaintiff's agent or attorney, setting forth the facts of the sale and want of title to the property so sold, and shall be served, returned, and heard together, with proof upon the question of title, as in other cases.

If it shall appear at the trial that the defendant's title to the property at the time of the purchase was good and valid, the proceedings shall be dismissed with costs, as in other cases.

This section shall apply to judgments and decrees for costs, upon affidavit of any party interested in the costs.

In case the sheriff or other officer making the sale shall not have taken any bond of indemnity, and the defendant in the execution shall proceed against the sheriff and other officer and recover judgment, the sheriff and other officer shall be substituted to the rights of the plaintiff under this section.

Code 1858, §§ 2990-2993 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 191, §§ 1-3); Acts 1875, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4719-4723; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8853-8857; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-720 — 26-724.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 239.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 50; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 68.

26-5-115. Minimum acceptable price for property sold.

The sheriff of each county in the state of Tennessee is hereby authorized to set a minimum acceptable price for every item, of property, both personal and real, to be sold at any sheriff's sale in the state provided such price shall be equal to or greater than fifty percent (50%) of the fair market value.

Acts 1978, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A., § 26-725.

26-5-116. Excess of sale price over debt — Use of property not sold.

The sheriff shall remit any excess of the sale price over the debt to the property owner from whom the property was seized.

The property, if it is not sold, shall not be used for personal or department use.

Acts 1978, ch. 808, § 2; T.C.A., § 26-726.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 32, 49.